Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-238
Nature of business.

A limited partnership may carry on any business that a partnership without limited partners may carry on, except for the purpose of banking or effecting insurance.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 6.